Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1652] State aquarium; site. All
those certain pieces or parcels of land situated at Waikiki, city and county of
Honolulu, used as an aquarium and more fully described in copy survey furnished
number 11528 as all of lots 114 to 118 inclusive and portions of lots 113 and
119 of the Kapiolani park lots as described in Executive Order No. 1817, are
set aside for public purposes, to wit: for the purposes of the state aquarium
under the direction of the board of regents of the University of Hawaii. The
board of regents shall establish and at all times maintain upon such lands the
state aquarium for public programs, education, research, and the exhibition to
the public of the aquatic life of Hawaii and other regions. The board shall
also establish and at all times maintain at the aquarium a marine biological
laboratory. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next